Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-260.07
Juvenile
pretrial diversion program; data; duties.

(1) On
January 30 of each year, every county attorney or city attorney
of a county or city which has a juvenile pretrial diversion program shall
report to the Director of Juvenile
Diversion Programs the information pertaining to the program required
by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the Nebraska Commission
on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice.

(2) Juvenile pretrial diversion program data shall be maintained
and compiled by the Director
of Juvenile Diversion Programs.

Laws 2003, LB 43, § 6;

Laws 2013, LB561, § 16.